Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Article 4. Decedent’s Estate or Terminating Income Interest.

Sec. 13.38.500.
Determination and distribution of net income.

After a decedent dies in the case of an estate, or after an income interest in a trust ends, a fiduciary

of an estate or of a terminating income interest shall determine the amount of net income and net principal receipts received from property specifically given to a beneficiary under (5) of this section and the provisions applicable to trustees in AS

13.38.550

—

13.38.860

; the fiduciary shall distribute the net income and net principal receipts to the beneficiary who is to receive the specific property;

shall distribute to a beneficiary or trust that receives a pecuniary amount a share of net income equal to the beneficiary’s or trust’s fractional interest in undistributed principal assets as determined under AS

13.38.510(a)

, (b)(1), (b)(3), and (c) — (e); the share accrues from the date of death of a decedent, in the case of an estate, or the date of death of a settlor or specified event, in the case of a revocable or irrevocable trust;

shall determine the remaining net income of a decedent’s estate or a terminating income interest under the provisions applicable to trustees in AS

13.38.550

—

13.38.860

and by

including in net income all income from property used to discharge liabilities; and

paying from principal the debts, the funeral expenses, the costs of disposition of remains, the family allowance under AS

13.12.404

, fees of personal representatives and their attorneys and accountants, and the taxes, related interest, and penalties described in AS

13.38.810(a)(7)

that are apportioned to the estate or terminating income interest by the governing instrument or applicable law;

shall distribute the net income remaining after distributions required by (2) of this section in the manner described in AS

13.38.510

to all other beneficiaries;

may not reduce principal or income receipts from property described in (1) of this section because of a payment described in AS

13.38.800

or

13.38.810

to the extent that the governing instrument or applicable law requires the fiduciary to make the payment from assets other than the property or to the extent that the fiduciary recovers or expects to recover the payment from a third party; the net income and principal receipts from the property are determined by

including all of the amounts the fiduciary receives or pays with respect to the property, whether those amounts accrued or became due before, on, or after the date of a decedent’s death or an income interest’s terminating event; and

making a reasonable provision for amounts that the fiduciary believes the estate or terminating income interest may become obligated to pay after the property is distributed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003; am § 5 ch 82 SLA 2004)

Sec. 13.38.510.
Distribution to residuary and remainder beneficiaries.

Each beneficiary described in AS

13.38.500

(4) is entitled to receive a portion of the net income equal to the beneficiary’s fractional interest in undistributed principal assets, using values as of the distribution date. If a fiduciary makes more than one distribution of assets to beneficiaries to whom this section applies, each beneficiary, including one who does not receive part of the distribution, is entitled, as of each distribution date, to the net income the fiduciary has received after the date of death or terminating event or earlier distribution date but has not distributed as of the current distribution date.

In determining a beneficiary’s share of net income, the following rules apply:

the beneficiary is entitled to receive a portion of the net income equal to the beneficiary’s fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets immediately before the distribution date, including assets that later may be sold or applied to meet principal obligations;

the beneficiary’s fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets shall be calculated without regard to property specifically given to a beneficiary and property required to pay pecuniary amounts;

the beneficiary’s fractional interest in the undistributed principal assets shall be calculated on the basis of the aggregate value of those assets as of the distribution date without reducing the value by any unpaid principal obligation.

If a fiduciary does not distribute all of the collected but undistributed net income to each person as of a distribution date, the fiduciary shall maintain appropriate records showing the interest of each beneficiary in that net income.

To the extent that the fiduciary considers it appropriate, if this section applies to the income from an asset, the fiduciary may apply the rules in this section to net gain or loss from the disposition of a principal asset realized after the date of death or terminating event or an earlier distribution date.

For the purposes of this section, the distribution date may be the date as of which the fiduciary calculates the value of the assets if that date is reasonably near the date on which assets are actually distributed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 145 SLA 2003)